sk_SK-spell/sk_SK.aff
FLAG num
PFX 2090 Y 1
PFX 2090 l l .
SFX 2091 Y 1
SFX 2091 zť iete .
PFX 2091 Y 1
PFX 2091 l l .
SFX 2092 Y 1
SFX 2092 ť ú .
PFX 2092 Y 1
PFX 2092 li l .
SFX 2093 Y 1
SFX 2093 ť 0 .
PFX 2093 Y 1
PFX 2093 li l .
SFX 2094 Y 1
SFX 2094 ť me .
PFX 2094 Y 1
PFX 2094 li l .
SFX 2095 Y 1
SFX 2095 ť te .
PFX 2095 Y 1
PFX 2095 li l .
SFX 2096 Y 1
SFX 2096 ť úc .
PFX 2096 Y 1
PFX 2096 li l .
SFX 2097 Y 1
SFX 2097 a 0 .
PFX 2097 Y 1
PFX 2097 li lí .
SFX 2098 N 1
SFX 2098 eň ňovi .
SFX 2099 N 1
SFX 2099 ono ôn .
SFX 2100 Y 1
SFX 2100 a 0 .
PFX 2100 Y 1
PFX 2100 lo lô .
SFX 2101 N 1
SFX 2101 ďka diek .
SFX 2102 N 1
SFX 2102 ož ži .
SFX 2103 N 1
SFX 2103 ož žou .
SFX 2104 N 1
SFX 2104 ož ží .
SFX 2105 N 1
SFX 2105 ož žiam .
SFX 2106 N 1
SFX 2106 ož žiach .
SFX 2107 N 1
SFX 2107 ož žami .
SFX 2108 N 1
SFX 2108 hať žem .
SFX 2109 N 1
SFX 2109 hať žeš .
SFX 2110 N 1
SFX 2110 hať že .
SFX 2111 N 1
SFX 2111 hať žeme .
SFX 2112 N 1
SFX 2112 hať žete .
SFX 2113 N 1
SFX 2113 hať žú .
SFX 2114 N 1
SFX 2114 hať ž .
SFX 2115 N 1
SFX 2115 hať žme .
SFX 2116 N 1
SFX 2116 hať žte .
SFX 2117 N 1
SFX 2117 hať žúc .
SFX 2118 N 1
SFX 2118 yko ýk .
SFX 2119 Y 1
SFX 2119 a 0 .
PFX 2119 Y 1
PFX 2119 ly lý .
SFX 2120 N 1
SFX 2120 ťa tence .
SFX 2121 N 1
SFX 2121 ťa teniec .
SFX 2122 N 1
SFX 2122 ťa tencom .
SFX 2123 N 1
SFX 2123 ťa tencoch .
SFX 2124 N 1
SFX 2124 ťa tencami .
SFX 2125 N 1
SFX 2125 aga ág .
SFX 2126 N 1
SFX 2126 esto iest .
SFX 2127 Y 1
SFX 2127 a 0 .
PFX 2127 Y 1
PFX 2127 ma má .
SFX 2128 N 1
SFX 2128 alý enší .
SFX 2129 N 1
SFX 2129 alý enšieho .
SFX 2130 N 1
SFX 2130 alý enšiemu .
SFX 2131 N 1
SFX 2131 alý enšom .
SFX 2132 N 1
SFX 2132 alý enším .
SFX 2133 N 1
SFX 2133 alý enších .
SFX 2134 N 1
SFX 2134 alý enšími .
SFX 2135 N 1
SFX 2135 alý enšie .
SFX 2136 N 1
SFX 2136 alý enšia .
SFX 2137 N 1
SFX 2137 alý enšej .
SFX 2138 N 1
SFX 2138 alý enšiu .
SFX 2139 N 1
SFX 2139 alý enšou .
SFX 2140 Y 1
SFX 2140 alý jmenší .
PFX 2140 Y 1
PFX 2140 0 n .
SFX 2141 Y 1
SFX 2141 alý jmenšieho .
PFX 2141 Y 1
PFX 2141 0 n .
SFX 2142 Y 1
SFX 2142 alý jmenšiemu .
PFX 2142 Y 1
PFX 2142 0 n .
SFX 2143 Y 1
SFX 2143 alý jmenšom .
PFX 2143 Y 1
PFX 2143 0 n .
SFX 2144 Y 1
SFX 2144 alý jmenším .
PFX 2144 Y 1
PFX 2144 0 n .
SFX 2145 Y 1
SFX 2145 alý jmenších .
PFX 2145 Y 1
PFX 2145 0 n .
SFX 2146 Y 1
SFX 2146 alý jmenšími .
PFX 2146 Y 1
PFX 2146 0 n .
SFX 2147 Y 1
SFX 2147 alý jmenšie .
PFX 2147 Y 1
PFX 2147 0 n .
SFX 2148 Y 1
SFX 2148 alý jmenšia .
PFX 2148 Y 1
PFX 2148 0 n .
SFX 2149 Y 1
SFX 2149 alý jmenšej .
PFX 2149 Y 1
PFX 2149 0 n .
SFX 2150 Y 1
SFX 2150 alý jmenšiu .
PFX 2150 Y 1
PFX 2150 0 n .
SFX 2151 Y 1
SFX 2151 alý jmenšou .
PFX 2151 Y 1
PFX 2151 0 n .
SFX 2152 Y 1
SFX 2152 o 0 .
PFX 2152 Y 1
PFX 2152 ma má .
SFX 2153 N 1
SFX 2153 i ere .
SFX 2154 N 1
SFX 2154 i eri .
SFX 2155 N 1
SFX 2155 i erou .
SFX 2156 N 1
SFX 2156 i erí .
SFX 2157 N 1
SFX 2157 i eriam .
SFX 2158 N 1
SFX 2158 i eriach .
SFX 2159 N 1
SFX 2159 i erami .
SFX 2160 N 1
SFX 2160 imum ím .
SFX 2161 N 1
SFX 2161 rta ŕt .
SFX 2162 N 1
SFX 2162 ť tere .
SFX 2163 N 1
SFX 2163 ť teri .
SFX 2164 N 1
SFX 2164 ť terou .
SFX 2165 N 1
SFX 2165 ť terí .
SFX 2166 N 1
SFX 2166 ť teriam .
SFX 2167 N 1
SFX 2167 ť teriach .
SFX 2168 N 1
SFX 2168 ť terami .
SFX 2169 Y 1
SFX 2169 a 0 .
PFX 2169 Y 1
PFX 2169 m mi .
SFX 2170 N 1
SFX 2170 andum ánd .
SFX 2171 Y 1
SFX 2171 o 0 .
PFX 2171 Y 1
PFX 2171 m mi .
SFX 2172 N 1
SFX 2172 g mog .
SFX 2173 N 1
SFX 2173 iasť ätiem .
SFX 2174 N 1
SFX 2174 iasť ätieš .
SFX 2175 N 1
SFX 2175 iasť ätie .
SFX 2176 N 1
SFX 2176 iasť ätieme .
SFX 2177 N 1
SFX 2177 iasť ätiete .
SFX 2178 N 1
SFX 2178 iasť ätú .
SFX 2179 N 1
SFX 2179 iasť äť .
SFX 2180 N 1
SFX 2180 iasť äťme .
SFX 2181 N 1
SFX 2181 iasť äťte .
SFX 2182 N 1
SFX 2182 iasť ätúc .
SFX 2183 Y 1
SFX 2183 sť m .
PFX 2183 Y 1
PFX 2183 m met .
SFX 2184 Y 1
SFX 2184 sť š .
PFX 2184 Y 1
PFX 2184 m met .
SFX 2185 Y 1
SFX 2185 sť 0 .
PFX 2185 Y 1
PFX 2185 m met .
SFX 2186 Y 1
SFX 2186 sť me .
PFX 2186 Y 1
PFX 2186 m met .
SFX 2187 Y 1
SFX 2187 sť te .
PFX 2187 Y 1
PFX 2187 m met .
SFX 2188 N 1
SFX 2188 ni ňou .
SFX 2189 N 1
SFX 2189 i í .
SFX 2190 N 1
SFX 2190 ňa ieň .
SFX 2191 N 1
SFX 2191 aty iat .
SFX 2192 N 1
SFX 2192 inda índ .
SFX 2193 N 1
SFX 2193 í ých .
SFX 2194 N 1
SFX 2194 í ým .
SFX 2195 N 1
SFX 2195 í ými .
SFX 2196 Y 1
SFX 2196 ť m .
PFX 2196 Y 1
PFX 2196 m me .
SFX 2197 Y 1
SFX 2197 ť š .
PFX 2197 Y 1
PFX 2197 m me .
SFX 2198 Y 1
SFX 2198 ť 0 .
PFX 2198 Y 1
PFX 2198 m me .
SFX 2199 Y 1
SFX 2199 ť me .
PFX 2199 Y 1
PFX 2199 m me .
SFX 2200 Y 1
SFX 2200 ť te .
PFX 2200 Y 1
PFX 2200 m me .
SFX 2201 Y 1
SFX 2201 oho ajviacej .
PFX 2201 Y 1
PFX 2201 m 0 .
SFX 2202 Y 1
SFX 2202 oho ajviac .
PFX 2202 Y 1
PFX 2202 m 0 .
SFX 2203 N 1
SFX 2203 yka ýk .
SFX 2204 N 1
SFX 2204 og gu .
SFX 2205 N 1
SFX 2205 og gom .
SFX 2206 N 1
SFX 2206 og gy .
SFX 2207 N 1
SFX 2207 og gov .
SFX 2208 N 1
SFX 2208 og goch .
SFX 2209 N 1
SFX 2209 og gami .
SFX 2210 Y 1
SFX 2210 a 0 .
PFX 2210 Y 1
PFX 2210 mr mŕ .
SFX 2211 N 1
SFX 2211 ik kovia .
SFX 2212 N 1
SFX 2212 rľa ŕľ .
SFX 2213 Y 1
SFX 2213 a 0 .
PFX 2213 Y 1
PFX 2213 mu mú .
SFX 2214 Y 1
SFX 2214 y 0 .
PFX 2214 Y 1
PFX 2214 0 ná .
SFX 2215 Y 1
SFX 2215 y i .
PFX 2215 Y 1
PFX 2215 0 na .
SFX 2216 Y 1
SFX 2216 a 0 .
PFX 2216 Y 1
PFX 2216 my mý .
SFX 2217 N 1
SFX 2217 eľ ľou .
SFX 2218 N 1
SFX 2218 eľ lí .
SFX 2219 N 1
SFX 2219 eľ liam .
SFX 2220 N 1
SFX 2220 eľ liach .
SFX 2221 Y 1
SFX 2221 a 0 .
PFX 2221 Y 1
PFX 2221 m mie .
SFX 2222 N 1
SFX 2222 álo enej .
SFX 2223 Y 1
SFX 2223 álo enej .
PFX 2223 Y 1
PFX 2223 0 naj .
SFX 2224 N 1
SFX 2224 äso ias .
SFX 2225 N 1
SFX 2225 äta iat .
SFX 2226 N 1
SFX 2226 ôj ojom .
SFX 2227 N 1
SFX 2227 ôj ojím .
SFX 2228 N 1
SFX 2228 ôj oji .
SFX 2229 N 1
SFX 2229 ôj ojich .
SFX 2230 N 1
SFX 2230 ôj ojim .
SFX 2231 N 1
SFX 2231 ôj ojimi .
SFX 2232 N 1
SFX 2232 ôj oje .
SFX 2233 N 1
SFX 2233 ôj oja .
SFX 2234 N 1
SFX 2234 ôj ojej .
SFX 2235 N 1
SFX 2235 ôj oju .
SFX 2236 N 1
SFX 2236 ôj ojou .
SFX 2237 N 1
SFX 2237 vec ca .
SFX 2238 N 1
SFX 2238 vec cu .
SFX 2239 N 1
SFX 2239 vec ci .
SFX 2240 N 1
SFX 2240 vec com .
SFX 2241 N 1
SFX 2241 vec ce .
SFX 2242 N 1
SFX 2242 vec cov .
SFX 2243 N 1
SFX 2243 vec coch .
SFX 2244 N 1
SFX 2244 vec cami .
SFX 2245 N 1
SFX 2245 sť ď .
SFX 2246 N 1
SFX 2246 sť ďme .
SFX 2247 N 1
SFX 2247 sť ďte .
SFX 2248 N 1
SFX 2248 ísť išiel .
SFX 2249 N 1
SFX 2249 ísť išla .
SFX 2250 N 1
SFX 2250 ísť išlo .
SFX 2251 N 1
SFX 2251 ísť išli .
SFX 2252 N 1
SFX 2252 k če .
SFX 2253 N 1
SFX 2253 človek ľudia .
SFX 2254 N 1
SFX 2254 človek ľudí .
SFX 2255 N 1
SFX 2255 človek ľuďom .
SFX 2256 N 1
SFX 2256 človek ľuďoch .
SFX 2257 N 1
SFX 2257 človek ľuďmi .
SFX 2258 Y 1
SFX 2258 a 0 .
PFX 2258 Y 1
PFX 2258 na ná .
SFX 2259 N 1
SFX 2259 kať čú .
SFX 2260 N 1
SFX 2260 kať čúc .
SFX 2261 N 1
SFX 2261 chať šu .
SFX 2262 N 1
SFX 2262 chať šuc .
SFX 2263 N 1
SFX 2263 lať eliem .
SFX 2264 N 1
SFX 2264 lať elieš .
SFX 2265 N 1
SFX 2265 lať elie .
SFX 2266 N 1
SFX 2266 lať elieme .
SFX 2267 N 1
SFX 2267 lať eliete .
SFX 2268 N 1
SFX 2268 lať elú .
SFX 2269 N 1
SFX 2269 lať eľ .
SFX 2270 N 1
SFX 2270 lať eľme .
SFX 2271 N 1
SFX 2271 lať eľte .
SFX 2272 N 1
SFX 2272 lať elúc .
SFX 2273 Y 1
SFX 2273 ko šie .
PFX 2273 Y 1
PFX 2273 na nanaj .
SFX 2274 N 1
SFX 2274 iasť asiem .
SFX 2275 N 1
SFX 2275 iasť asieš .
SFX 2276 N 1
SFX 2276 iasť asie .
SFX 2277 N 1
SFX 2277 iasť asieme .
SFX 2278 N 1
SFX 2278 iasť asiete .
SFX 2279 N 1
SFX 2279 iasť asú .
SFX 2280 N 1
SFX 2280 iasť as .
SFX 2281 N 1
SFX 2281 iasť asme .
SFX 2282 N 1
SFX 2282 iasť aste .
SFX 2283 N 1
SFX 2283 iasť asúc .
SFX 2284 N 1
SFX 2284 alko álk .
SFX 2285 N 1
SFX 2285 esia ies .
SFX 2286 N 1
SFX 2286 esá ies .
SFX 2287 Y 1
SFX 2287 ať íme .
PFX 2287 Y 1
PFX 2287 ne nepo .
SFX 2288 Y 1
SFX 2288 ať íte .
PFX 2288 Y 1
PFX 2288 ne nepo .
SFX 2289 Y 1
SFX 2289 ať ia .
PFX 2289 Y 1
PFX 2289 ne nepo .
SFX 2290 Y 1
SFX 2290 ať ím .
PFX 2290 Y 1
PFX 2290 ne nepo .
SFX 2291 Y 1
SFX 2291 ať íš .
PFX 2291 Y 1
PFX 2291 ne nepo .
SFX 2292 Y 1
SFX 2292 ať í .
PFX 2292 Y 1
PFX 2292 ne nepo .
SFX 2293 N 1
SFX 2293 tať ťem .
SFX 2294 N 1
SFX 2294 tať ťeš .
SFX 2295 N 1
SFX 2295 tať ťe .
SFX 2296 N 1
SFX 2296 tať ťeme .
SFX 2297 N 1
SFX 2297 tať ťete .
SFX 2298 N 1
SFX 2298 tať ťú .
SFX 2299 N 1
SFX 2299 tať ť .
SFX 2300 N 1
SFX 2300 tať ťme .
SFX 2301 N 1
SFX 2301 tať ťte .
SFX 2302 N 1
SFX 2302 tať ťúc .
SFX 2303 N 1
SFX 2303 ebyť ieto .
SFX 2304 N 1
SFX 2304 ebyť iet .
SFX 2305 N 1
SFX 2305 byť ni .
SFX 2306 N 1
SFX 2306 byť súc .
SFX 2307 Y 1
SFX 2307 ovať ujeme .
PFX 2307 Y 1
PFX 2307 ne nepo .
SFX 2308 Y 1
SFX 2308 ovať ujete .
PFX 2308 Y 1
PFX 2308 ne nepo .
SFX 2309 Y 1
SFX 2309 ovať ujú .
PFX 2309 Y 1
PFX 2309 ne nepo .
SFX 2310 Y 1
SFX 2310 ovať ujem .
PFX 2310 Y 1
PFX 2310 ne nepo .
SFX 2311 Y 1
SFX 2311 ovať uješ .
PFX 2311 Y 1
PFX 2311 ne nepo .
SFX 2312 Y 1
SFX 2312 ovať uje .
PFX 2312 Y 1
PFX 2312 ne nepo .
SFX 2313 N 1
SFX 2313 cieť tiac .
SFX 2314 Y 1
SFX 2314 a 0 .
PFX 2314 Y 1
PFX 2314 n ni .
SFX 2315 N 1
SFX 2315 hnať poženieme .
SFX 2316 N 1
SFX 2316 hnať poženiete .
SFX 2317 N 1
SFX 2317 hnať poženú .
SFX 2318 N 1
SFX 2318 hnať poženiem .
SFX 2319 N 1
SFX 2319 hnať poženieš .
SFX 2320 N 1
SFX 2320 hnať poženie .
SFX 2321 Y 1
SFX 2321 úť ieme .
PFX 2321 Y 1
PFX 2321 ne nepo .
SFX 2322 Y 1
SFX 2322 úť iete .
PFX 2322 Y 1
PFX 2322 ne nepo .
SFX 2323 Y 1
SFX 2323 ť 0 .
PFX 2323 Y 1
PFX 2323 ne nepo .
SFX 2324 Y 1
SFX 2324 úť iem .
PFX 2324 Y 1
PFX 2324 ne nepo .
SFX 2325 Y 1
SFX 2325 úť ieš .
PFX 2325 Y 1
PFX 2325 ne nepo .
SFX 2326 Y 1
SFX 2326 úť ie .
PFX 2326 Y 1
PFX 2326 ne nepo .
SFX 2327 N 1
SFX 2327 jsť pôjdeme .
SFX 2328 N 1
SFX 2328 jsť pôjdete .
SFX 2329 N 1
SFX 2329 jsť pôjdu .
SFX 2330 N 1
SFX 2330 jsť pôjdem .
SFX 2331 N 1
SFX 2331 jsť pôjdeš .
SFX 2332 N 1
SFX 2332 jsť pôjde .
SFX 2333 N 1
SFX 2333 sť dú .
SFX 2334 N 1
SFX 2334 jsť choď .
SFX 2335 N 1
SFX 2335 jsť iď .
SFX 2336 N 1
SFX 2336 jsť poď .
SFX 2337 N 1
SFX 2337 jsť poďme .
SFX 2338 N 1
SFX 2338 jsť choďme .
SFX 2339 N 1
SFX 2339 jsť iďme .
SFX 2340 N 1
SFX 2340 jsť iďte .
SFX 2341 N 1
SFX 2341 jsť choďte .
SFX 2342 N 1
SFX 2342 jsť poďte .
SFX 2343 N 1
SFX 2343 sť dúc .
SFX 2344 N 1
SFX 2344 jsť šiel .
SFX 2345 N 1
SFX 2345 jsť išiel .
SFX 2346 N 1
SFX 2346 jsť šla .
SFX 2347 N 1
SFX 2347 jsť išla .
SFX 2348 N 1
SFX 2348 jsť išlo .
SFX 2349 N 1
SFX 2349 jsť šlo .
SFX 2350 N 1
SFX 2350 jsť šli .
SFX 2351 N 1
SFX 2351 jsť išli .
SFX 2352 Y 1
SFX 2352 úť eme .
PFX 2352 Y 1
PFX 2352 ne nepo .
SFX 2353 Y 1
SFX 2353 úť ete .
PFX 2353 Y 1
PFX 2353 ne nepo .
SFX 2354 Y 1
SFX 2354 úť em .
PFX 2354 Y 1
PFX 2354 ne nepo .
SFX 2355 Y 1
SFX 2355 úť eš .
PFX 2355 Y 1
PFX 2355 ne nepo .
SFX 2356 Y 1
SFX 2356 úť e .
PFX 2356 Y 1
PFX 2356 ne nepo .
SFX 2357 Y 1
SFX 2357 ieť íme .
PFX 2357 Y 1
PFX 2357 ne nepo .
SFX 2358 Y 1
SFX 2358 ieť íte .
PFX 2358 Y 1
PFX 2358 ne nepo .
SFX 2359 Y 1
SFX 2359 eť a .
PFX 2359 Y 1
PFX 2359 ne nepo .
SFX 2360 Y 1
SFX 2360 ieť ím .
PFX 2360 Y 1
PFX 2360 ne nepo .
SFX 2361 Y 1
SFX 2361 ieť íš .
PFX 2361 Y 1
PFX 2361 ne nepo .
SFX 2362 Y 1
SFX 2362 ieť í .
PFX 2362 Y 1
PFX 2362 ne nepo .
SFX 2363 N 1
SFX 2363 liezť polezieme .
SFX 2364 N 1
SFX 2364 liezť poleziete .
SFX 2365 N 1
SFX 2365 liezť polezú .
SFX 2366 N 1
SFX 2366 liezť poleziem .
SFX 2367 N 1
SFX 2367 liezť polezieš .
SFX 2368 N 1
SFX 2368 liezť polezie .
SFX 2369 N 1
SFX 2369 niesť ponesieme .
SFX 2370 N 1
SFX 2370 niesť ponesiete .
SFX 2371 N 1
SFX 2371 niesť ponesú .
SFX 2372 N 1
SFX 2372 niesť ponesiem .
SFX 2373 N 1
SFX 2373 niesť ponesieš .
SFX 2374 N 1
SFX 2374 niesť ponesie .
SFX 2375 N 1
SFX 2375 ájsť ašiel .
SFX 2376 N 1
SFX 2376 ájsť ašla .
SFX 2377 N 1
SFX 2377 ájsť ašlo .
SFX 2378 N 1
SFX 2378 ájsť ašli .
SFX 2379 N 1
SFX 2379 ať ímem .
SFX 2380 N 1
SFX 2380 ať ímeš .
SFX 2381 N 1
SFX 2381 ať ímeme .
SFX 2382 N 1
SFX 2382 ať ímete .
SFX 2383 N 1
SFX 2383 ať ímu .
SFX 2384 N 1
SFX 2384 ať ímme .
SFX 2385 N 1
SFX 2385 ať ímte .
SFX 2386 N 1
SFX 2386 ať ímuc .
